services/web/node_modules/@overleaf/dictionaries/dictionaries/eu.aff
FLAG num
SFX 136 Y 77
SFX 136 0 0 .
SFX 136 0 ño .
SFX 136 0 ño/1,385 .
SFX 136 0 a .
SFX 136 0 ago .
SFX 136 0 ago/1,360 .
SFX 136 0 ak .
SFX 136 0 an .
SFX 136 0 arekin .
SFX 136 0 areki/1,368 .
SFX 136 0 aren .
SFX 136 0 arendako .
SFX 136 0 arentzat .
SFX 136 0 arentza/1,368 .
SFX 136 0 aren/1,369 .
SFX 136 0 ari .
SFX 136 0 az .
SFX 136 0 a/1,370 .
SFX 136 0 dun .
SFX 136 0 dun/1,371 .
SFX 136 0 ean .
SFX 136 0 ei .
SFX 136 0 ek .
SFX 136 0 ekin .
SFX 136 0 eki/1,368 .
SFX 136 0 eko .
SFX 136 0 eko/1,386 .
SFX 136 0 en .
SFX 136 0 endako .
SFX 136 0 entzat .
SFX 136 0 entza/1,368 .
SFX 136 0 en/1,369 .
SFX 136 0 era .
SFX 136 0 eraino .
SFX 136 0 eraino/1,368 .
SFX 136 0 erantz .
SFX 136 0 erantz/1,378 .
SFX 136 0 eranz/1,368 .
SFX 136 0 erat .
SFX 136 0 era/1,379 .
SFX 136 0 er/1,381 .
SFX 136 0 eta/1,373 .
SFX 136 0 etik .
SFX 136 0 eti/1,368 .
SFX 136 0 ez .
SFX 136 0 ez/1,368 .
SFX 136 0 e/1,380 .
SFX 136 0 gatik .
SFX 136 0 gati/1,368 .
SFX 136 0 gile .
SFX 136 0 gile/1,360 .
SFX 136 0 i .
SFX 136 0 ik .
SFX 136 0 ka .
SFX 136 0 ka/1,368 .
SFX 136 0 oi .
SFX 136 0 ok .
SFX 136 0 okin .
SFX 136 0 oki/1,368 .
SFX 136 0 on .
SFX 136 0 ontzat .
SFX 136 0 ontza/1,368 .
SFX 136 0 on/1,369 .
SFX 136 0 otaz .
SFX 136 0 ota/1,373 .
SFX 136 0 oz .
SFX 136 0 pe .
SFX 136 0 pe/1,377 .
SFX 136 0 tsu .
SFX 136 0 tsu/1,359 .
SFX 136 0 txo .
SFX 136 0 txo/1,385 .
SFX 136 0 tzar .
SFX 136 0 tzarr/1,387 .
SFX 136 0 tzar/1,383 .
SFX 136 0 tzat .
SFX 136 0 tza/1,368 .
SFX 135 Y 24
SFX 135 0 0 .
SFX 135 0 araz .
SFX 135 0 araz/1,362 .
SFX 135 0 dura .
SFX 135 0 dura/1,357 .
SFX 135 0 dur/1,358 .
SFX 135 0 garri .
SFX 135 0 garri/1,359 .
SFX 135 0 men .
SFX 135 0 mendu .
SFX 135 0 mendu/1,360 .
SFX 135 0 men/1,361 .
SFX 135 0 pen .
SFX 135 0 pen/1,361 .
SFX 135 0 taile .
SFX 135 0 taile/1,364 .
SFX 135 0 tu .
SFX 135 0 tu/1,363 .
SFX 135 0 tze .
SFX 135 0 tzear .
SFX 135 0 tzeke .
SFX 135 0 tzen .
SFX 135 0 tzen/1,365 .
SFX 135 0 tze/1,366 .
SFX 134 Y 78
SFX 134 0 0 .
SFX 134 0 ño .
SFX 134 0 ño/1,367 .
SFX 134 0 a .
SFX 134 0 ago .
SFX 134 0 ago/1,360 .
SFX 134 0 ak .
SFX 134 0 an .
SFX 134 0 arekin .
SFX 134 0 areki/1,368 .
SFX 134 0 aren .
SFX 134 0 arendako .
SFX 134 0 arentzat .
SFX 134 0 arentza/1,368 .
SFX 134 0 aren/1,369 .
SFX 134 0 ari .
SFX 134 0 az .
SFX 134 0 a/1,370 .
SFX 134 0 dun .
SFX 134 0 dun/1,371 .
SFX 134 0 ean .
SFX 134 0 egi .
SFX 134 0 egi/1,360 .
SFX 134 0 ei .
SFX 134 0 ek .
SFX 134 0 ekin .
SFX 134 0 eki/1,368 .
SFX 134 0 eko .
SFX 134 0 eko/1,376 .
SFX 134 0 en .
SFX 134 0 endako .
SFX 134 0 entzat .
SFX 134 0 entza/1,368 .
SFX 134 0 en/1,372 .
SFX 134 0 era .
SFX 134 0 eraino .
SFX 134 0 eraino/1,368 .
SFX 134 0 erantz .
SFX 134 0 erantz/1,378 .
SFX 134 0 eranz/1,368 .
SFX 134 0 erat .
SFX 134 0 era/1,379 .
SFX 134 0 er/1,381 .
SFX 134 0 eta/1,373 .
SFX 134 0 etik .
SFX 134 0 eti/1,368 .
SFX 134 0 ez .
SFX 134 0 ez/1,368 .
SFX 134 0 e/1,380 .
SFX 134 0 gatik .
SFX 134 0 gati/1,368 .
SFX 134 0 i .
SFX 134 0 ik .
SFX 134 0 ki .
SFX 134 0 ki/1,374 .
SFX 134 0 oi .
SFX 134 0 ok .
SFX 134 0 okin .
SFX 134 0 oki/1,368 .
SFX 134 0 on .
SFX 134 0 ontzat .
SFX 134 0 ontza/1,368 .
SFX 134 0 on/1,369 .
SFX 134 0 otaz .
SFX 134 0 ota/1,373 .
SFX 134 0 oz .
SFX 134 0 pe .
SFX 134 0 pe/1,377 .
SFX 134 0 tasun .
SFX 134 0 tasun/1,361 .
SFX 134 0 txo .
SFX 134 0 txo/1,367 .
SFX 134 0 tzar .
SFX 134 0 tzarr/1,382 .
SFX 134 0 tzar/1,383 .
SFX 134 0 tzat .
SFX 134 0 tza/1,368 .
SFX 134 0 xe/1,384 .
SFX 139 Y 19
SFX 139 0 0 .
SFX 139 0 ek .
SFX 139 0 ekin .
SFX 139 0 eki/1,368 .
SFX 139 0 eko .
SFX 139 0 eko/1,391 .
SFX 139 0 en .
SFX 139 0 endako .
SFX 139 0 entzat .
SFX 139 0 entza/1,368 .
SFX 139 0 en/1,369 .
SFX 139 0 eta/1,373 .
SFX 139 0 ez .
SFX 139 0 ez/1,368 .
SFX 139 0 e/1,380 .
SFX 139 0 gatik .
SFX 139 0 gati/1,368 .
SFX 139 0 i .
SFX 139 0 ik .
SFX 138 Y 75
SFX 138 0 0 .
SFX 138 0 a .
SFX 138 0 ago .
SFX 138 0 ago/1,360 .
SFX 138 0 ak .
SFX 138 0 an .
SFX 138 0 arekin .
SFX 138 0 areki/1,368 .
SFX 138 0 aren .
SFX 138 0 arendako .
SFX 138 0 arentzat .
SFX 138 0 arentza/1,368 .
SFX 138 0 aren/1,369 .
SFX 138 0 ari .
SFX 138 0 az .
SFX 138 0 a/1,370 .
SFX 138 0 dun .
SFX 138 0 dun/1,371 .
SFX 138 0 ean .
SFX 138 0 ei .
SFX 138 0 ek .
SFX 138 0 ekin .
SFX 138 0 eki/1,368 .
SFX 138 0 eko .
SFX 138 0 eko/1,386 .
SFX 138 0 en .
SFX 138 0 endako .
SFX 138 0 entzat .
SFX 138 0 entza/1,368 .
SFX 138 0 en/1,369 .
SFX 138 0 era .
SFX 138 0 eraino .
SFX 138 0 eraino/1,368 .
SFX 138 0 erantz .
SFX 138 0 erantz/1,378 .
SFX 138 0 eranz/1,368 .
SFX 138 0 erat .
SFX 138 0 era/1,379 .
SFX 138 0 er/1,381 .
SFX 138 0 eta/1,373 .
SFX 138 0 etik .
SFX 138 0 eti/1,368 .
SFX 138 0 ez .
SFX 138 0 ez/1,368 .
SFX 138 0 e/1,380 .
SFX 138 0 gatik .
SFX 138 0 gati/1,368 .
SFX 138 0 gile .
SFX 138 0 gile/1,360 .
SFX 138 0 i .
SFX 138 0 ik .
SFX 138 0 ka .
SFX 138 0 ka/1,368 .
SFX 138 0 oi .
SFX 138 0 ok .
SFX 138 0 okin .
SFX 138 0 oki/1,368 .
SFX 138 0 on .
SFX 138 0 ontzat .
SFX 138 0 ontza/1,368 .
SFX 138 0 on/1,369 .
SFX 138 0 otaz .
SFX 138 0 ota/1,373 .
SFX 138 0 oz .
SFX 138 0 pe .
SFX 138 0 pe/1,377 .
SFX 138 0 tsu .
SFX 138 0 tsu/1,359 .
SFX 138 0 txo .
SFX 138 0 txo/1,385 .
SFX 138 0 tzar .
SFX 138 0 tzarr/1,387 .
SFX 138 0 tzar/1,383 .
SFX 138 0 tzat .
SFX 138 0 tza/1,368 .
SFX 24 Y 47
SFX 24 0 0 .
SFX 24 0 a .
SFX 24 0 aino .
SFX 24 0 aino/1,368 .
SFX 24 0 antz .
SFX 24 0 antz/1,378 .
SFX 24 0 anz/1,368 .
SFX 24 0 at .
SFX 24 0 a/1,379 .
SFX 24 0 ek .
SFX 24 0 ekin .
SFX 24 0 eki/1,368 .
SFX 24 0 eko .
SFX 24 0 eko/1,376 .
SFX 24 0 en .
SFX 24 0 endako .
SFX 24 0 entzat .
SFX 24 0 entza/1,368 .
SFX 24 0 en/1,369 .
SFX 24 0 era .
SFX 24 0 eraino .
SFX 24 0 eraino/1,368 .
SFX 24 0 erantz .
SFX 24 0 erantz/1,378 .
SFX 24 0 eranz/1,368 .
SFX 24 0 erat .
SFX 24 0 era/1,379 .
SFX 24 0 er/1,381 .
SFX 24 0 etik .
SFX 24 0 eti/1,368 .
SFX 24 0 ez .
SFX 24 0 ez/1,368 .
SFX 24 0 e/1,380 .
SFX 24 0 gatik .
SFX 24 0 gati/1,368 .
SFX 24 0 i .
SFX 24 0 ik .
SFX 24 0 i/1,368 .
SFX 24 0 ko .
SFX 24 0 koa .
SFX 24 0 koak .
SFX 24 0 koa/1,375 .
SFX 24 0 ko/1,376 .
SFX 24 0 r/1,381 .
SFX 24 0 tako .
SFX 24 0 tik .
SFX 24 0 ti/1,368 .
SFX 25 Y 27
SFX 25 0 ek .
SFX 25 0 ekin .
SFX 25 0 eki/1,368 .
SFX 25 0 eko .
SFX 25 0 eko/1,376 .
SFX 25 0 en .
SFX 25 0 endako .
SFX 25 0 entzat .
SFX 25 0 entza/1,368 .
SFX 25 0 en/1,369 .
SFX 25 0 era .
SFX 25 0 eraino .
SFX 25 0 eraino/1,368 .
SFX 25 0 erantz .
SFX 25 0 erantz/1,378 .
SFX 25 0 eranz/1,368 .
SFX 25 0 erat .
SFX 25 0 era/1,379 .
SFX 25 0 er/1,381 .
SFX 25 0 etik .
SFX 25 0 eti/1,368 .
SFX 25 0 ez .
SFX 25 0 ez/1,368 .
SFX 25 0 e/1,380 .
SFX 25 0 i .
SFX 25 0 ik .
SFX 25 0 i/1,368 .
SFX 26 Y 21
SFX 26 0 0 .
SFX 26 0 gatik .
SFX 26 0 gati/1,368 .
SFX 26 0 ko .
SFX 26 0 koa .
SFX 26 0 koak .
SFX 26 0 koa/1,375 .
SFX 26 0 ko/1,376 .
SFX 26 0 ra .
SFX 26 0 raino .
SFX 26 0 raino/1,368 .
SFX 26 0 rantz .
SFX 26 0 rantz/1,378 .
SFX 26 0 ranz/1,368 .
SFX 26 0 rat .
SFX 26 0 ra/1,379 .
SFX 26 0 r/1,381 .
SFX 26 0 tako .
SFX 26 0 tik .
SFX 26 0 ti/1,368 .
SFX 26 0 z/1,368 .
SFX 27 Y 23
SFX 27 0 0 .
SFX 27 0 ek .
SFX 27 0 ekin .
SFX 27 0 eki/1,368 .
SFX 27 0 en .
SFX 27 0 endako .
SFX 27 0 entzat .
SFX 27 0 entza/1,368 .
SFX 27 0 en/1,369 .
SFX 27 0 ez .
SFX 27 0 ez/1,368 .
SFX 27 0 gan .
SFX 27 0 gana .
SFX 27 0 gana/1,368 .
SFX 27 0 gandik .
SFX 27 0 gandi/1,368 .
SFX 27 0 gatik .
SFX 27 0 gati/1,368 .
SFX 27 0 i .
SFX 27 0 ik .
SFX 27 0 taz .
SFX 27 0 tzat .
SFX 27 0 tza/1,368 .
